Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
24-11-804. Administration of small funds by Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

In those local firemen's relief and pension funds that cover fewer than five (5) members, a local board of trustees may no longer exist, and the fund shall be designated as inactive by the employer.

As used in this section, “member” includes an active member or a retired member of the fund described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section but does not include beneficiaries.

Administrative responsibility for the fund shall be assigned to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System as allowed by §§ 24-10-301 and 24-10-302 and as provided in the following procedure:

The actuary under contract to the system shall compute the retirement reserve for vested and active members and for eligible beneficiaries of the inactive fund. After receiving the report of the actuary, the employer shall transfer the computed reserve to the system to be held in an account designed as the retirement reserve for the inactive fund and from which the system shall pay eligible beneficiaries.

The retirement reserve and any additional employer contributions shall include such amounts as are necessary to provide administrative expenses for the system, but such expenses shall not exceed a total of one-half of one percent (0.5%) of active member payroll plus one percent (1%) of annual reserve assets.

Any excess assets of the fund remaining after the retirement reserve is created shall be transferred to an account designated by the employer, to be used solely for the purpose of making payments to the system for employee coverage administered under the system, and for no other purpose.

If a former member of the local pension fund returns to service in which the employee would have again become a member of the local fund, the past service credit may be purchased by the employer for the employee under the system and the purchase costs shall be amortized in the same manner as other service credit purchases are amortized under the system.

Retired members and beneficiaries of any inactive fund under administration of the system that was actuarially sound before being designated inactive shall be eligible for annual redetermination of benefits as defined in § 24-10-612.

Should the law mandate an increase in benefits to retired members or their beneficiaries, the increases shall be payable from the retirement reserve of the inactive fund.

No prorating of benefits shall be allowed in inactive funds under the administration of the system.

If the retirement reserve of an inactive fund shall become inadequate to pay full benefits to eligible recipients or if active members are still covered by the fund, the system shall require of the employer and the employer shall remit such actuarially computed amounts as are necessary to pay full benefits to current and future recipients.

Once a fund becomes inactive and a retirement reserve is created as required by this section, the employer may continue to collect such millages, state insurance tax turnback, and other revenues allowed by law for the support of firefighter retirement programs.

The revenues shall be deposited locally into an account designated by the employer solely for making payments to the system for employee coverage administered under the system, and for no other purpose.

All employer contributions for inactive funds shall be made in such amounts and in such manner, form, and frequency as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall require.

The pension records of inactive funds and other materials and reports as may be required by the board to administer the inactive funds shall be provided to the system in such manner as the board shall require.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 7737; Acts 1985, No. 927, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2201; Acts 1987, No. 405, § 1; 2007, No. 1056, §§ 3, 4; 2009, No. 255, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “fire” for “police” in (a)(1).

24-11-805. Investment.

All moneys provided for the firemen's relief and pension fund by this act shall be paid over to and received by the treasurer of the city or town for the sole use and benefit of the firemen's relief and pension fund, and the firemen's relief and pension fund shall be used for no other purpose.

The additional duties imposed upon the treasurer shall be and comprise additional duties for which he or she shall be liable under his or her oath and bond as the city or town treasurer.

The board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund shall have the power with the consent of a majority of the firefighters at the time employed, expressed in writing and filed with the city clerk, to authorize the treasurer to draw sums from its treasury to invest in the name of the board in interest-bearing bonds of the United States, of the State of Arkansas, or of the city where the board is located, in a local government joint investment trust pursuant to the Local Government Joint Investment Trust Act, § 19-8-301 et seq., the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, in certificates of deposit or time deposits in banks duly established and authorized to do business in this state, or in savings and loan associations duly established and authorized to do business in this state.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, all securities shall be deposited with the treasurer of the board and shall be subject to the orders of the board.

However, in those firemen's relief and pension funds in which assets exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the board of trustees may employ:

An investment advisor as defined in § 24-10-402(a)(2)(A)(ii) to invest the assets, subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon the system, as provided by § 24-10-401 et seq.; and

A trustee or custodian to hold the assets.

Investments shall not be limited to interest-bearing bonds, certificates of deposit, and time deposits.

The total amount of fees paid for investment advisors, investment advisory services, investment educational services, trustee services, custodial and administrative services, and investment management services when the managers are required to perform security trades on a best execution basis shall be:

Limited to no more than three percent (3%) annually of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of plan assets, plus no more than two percent (2%) annually of the next five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of plan assets, plus no more than one percent (1%) annually of plan assets over one million dollars ($1,000,000); and

Clearly stated, in total, on all monthly, quarterly, and annual statements prepared for the board.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment moneys provided for the firemen's relief and pension fund shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 15; Pope's Dig., § 7751; Acts 1939, No. 84, § 1; 1957, No. 121, § 2; 1967, No. 156, § 1; 1985, No. 6, § 3; 1985, No. 16, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2223; Acts 1989, No. 152, § 4; 1995, No. 615, § 3; 1999, No. 901, § 2; 2005, No. 2094, § 2; 2009, No. 1201, §§ 4, 5; 2017, No. 794, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section” in (c); inserted (d)(1)(B) and redesignated the existing text of (d)(1) accordingly; and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment added (e).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.

24-11-806. Payments generally.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, payments provided for in this act shall be made monthly upon proper vouchers and in such manner as provided for in other disbursements of the city or town.

In a firemen's relief and pension fund in which the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund has employed a trustee or custodian under § 24-11-805(d) to hold the assets, the trustee or custodian may pay benefits to persons and beneficiaries entitled to benefits under the fund as directed by the board.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 17; Pope's Dig., § 7753; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2225; Acts 2009, No. 1201, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated the existing text accordingly; inserted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” in (a); and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.

24-11-807. Minimum payments generally — Proration upon insufficiency of fund — Supplemental pensions.

For volunteer firefighters, in no case shall the payment to any retired member be less than one hundred dollars ($100) per month, and the payment shall be made in accordance with the justice and equity of each case as determined by the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund.

Should the fund provided for in this subchapter be insufficient to make full payment of the amount of pensions to all persons entitled thereto, then the fund shall be prorated among those entitled by the proper authorities as may be deemed just and equitable.

The payment provided for in this section shall not be made until after the payment in full of all claims or demands against the fund arising or accruing under the provisions of § 24-11-819(c).

For the purpose of determining how to prorate benefits, the proration shall be considered just and equitable if:

The board pays the full minimum benefit each month to all eligible beneficiaries until assets in the fund are depleted for the fiscal year, at which time all payments shall cease until revenues are received for the next fiscal year; or

The board decreases all payments to all eligible beneficiaries by an equal proportion for the fiscal year and does not allow the assets in the fund to become fully depleted.

In cities having a population of twenty thousand (20,000) or more, if the board of the firemen's relief and pension fund shall determine that the balances in the fund together with estimated income thereto will provide an amount sufficient to pay additional minimum pensions to volunteer firefighters entitled to the pensions. Then, by adoption of a resolution by majority vote of the full membership of the board, the board may provide for the payment of supplemental, additional minimum pensions in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month per retired volunteer firefighter, or such lesser amount as the board shall determine can be paid from fund balances and estimated income without jeopardizing or reducing other benefits payable from the fund.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 20; Pope's Dig., § 7756; Acts 1963, No. 524, § 1; 1971, No. 64, § 1; 1985, No. 338, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2227; Acts 1993, No. 1197, § 5; 2003, No. 1370, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1197, § 6, provided:

“The increased benefits provided for under the provisions of this act shall only be paid provided the retirement funds are actuarially sound after the increase as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.”

24-11-808. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning resumption of minimum payments in municipalities of 755 to 763 persons, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 554, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 585, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2227.1.

24-11-809. Apportionment of insurance premium tax generally.

There is apportioned and set aside for the use and benefit of duly constituted firemen's relief and pension funds and for the administrative and actuarial expenses of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board the annual taxes of two and one-half percent (2.5%) on all foreign and alien premiums collected by all property and casualty insurance companies, corporations, or associations incorporated under the laws of any state or nation and doing business in the State of Arkansas after all cancellations and dividends to policyholders are deducted as provided by §§ 23-60-102, 24-11-809, 26-57-601 — 26-57-605, and 26-57-607 upon real and personal property insured against the perils of fire and extended coverage, tornado, windstorm, cyclone, and hail, except upon growing crops, and located in or at cities, towns, and fire protection districts in the State of Arkansas coming within the provisions of this act.

The premium taxes collected in this subsection shall be placed in a fund combined with the premium taxes collected pursuant to § 24-11-301. The combined fund shall be entitled the “Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund”.

In the case of multiperil policies with a single premium for both the property and casualty coverages, the portion of the taxable premium shall be as follows:

In the case of commercial multiperil policies, seventy percent (70%);

In the case of homeowners' policies, forty-five percent (45%);

In the case of automobile physical damage policies, nine percent (9%); and

In the case of inland marine policies, fifteen percent (15%).

All additional revenues collected as a result of the levy of the insurance premium tax on domestic insurers, other than for premiums or copayments for life, disability, legal, wet marine, and foreign trade, and health maintenance organization insurance or contracts shall be special revenues and shall be apportioned and remitted to the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 7748; Acts 1949, No. 488, § 1; 1965, No. 431, § 3; 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 24, § 4; 1981, No. 595, § 2; 1985, No. 754, § 1; 1985, No. 992, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2212; Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 6; 1997, No. 119, § 2; 1997, No. 1077, § 1; 1999, No. 1570, § 3; 2001, No. 1540, § 2; 2001, No. 1543, § 6; 2001, No. 1701, § 5; 2003, No. 1473, § 62; 2003, No. 1797, § 3; 2013, No. 41, § 24.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1999, No. 1570, § 6, provided:

“The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of §§ 24-11-301, 24-11-302, 24-11-809, and 24-11-810.”

Pursuant to Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 72, the amendment of this section by Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 3, supersedes the amendment of this section by Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 62.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “and the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Guarantee Fund” following “Review Board” in (a)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.

24-11-810. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning allocation and apportionment of insurance premium tax, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1921, No. 491, § 13; Pope's Dig., § 7749; Acts 1949, No. 488, § 2; 1965, No. 431, § 3; 1981, No. 595, §§ 3, 5, 6; 1985, No. 160, § 3; 1985, No. 754, §§ 2, 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3809, 19-2212.1, 19-2212.2, 19-2213; Acts 1987, No. 1033, § 5; 1999, No. 1288, § 1; 1999, No. 1570, § 4; 2001, No. 1539, § 2; 2001, No. 1543, § 7; 2001, No. 1701, §§ 6-8.

24-11-811. Appropriations of insurance premium tax — Planned community property owners' associations.

As used in this section, “planned community property owners' association” means an incorporated nonprofit organization operating under recorded land agreements through which each lot owner in a planned unit or other described land area is automatically a member and each lot is automatically subject to a charge for a proportionate share of the expenses for the organization's activities, such as maintaining common properties, and which acts as the directing or governing body of a real estate development developed by a single developer, containing not fewer than five thousand (5,000) acres, which has been or is being developed under a comprehensive plan for a community containing streets and other public services, parks, and other recreational facilities for common use by the residents thereof; which has been subdivided into sufficient lots for residential use to accommodate a projected population of no fewer than one thousand (1,000) persons; which is not incorporated as a city or town; and for which a statement of record has been filed with the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development under the Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq.

Any planned community property owners' association with a firemen's relief and pension fund established prior to July 1, 1981, under §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, shall participate in the distribution of insurance premium tax revenues to the same extent as fire departments and fire protection districts under §§ 24-11-809, 24-11-810, 24-10-401 — 24-10-409, and any other laws providing for the distribution of insurance premium tax moneys to fire departments or fire protection districts.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 406, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2234, 19-2235.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Title X of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, Pub. L. No. 111-203,
transferred rulemaking authority for a number of consumer financial protection laws from seven federal agencies, including that of the United States Housing and Urban Development referenced in (a), to the Bureau of Consumer Financial Protection as of July 21, 2011.

24-11-812. Tax levy by city council.

After being once approved by a majority of those voting on the question at any general or special election of any city of the first class or city of the second class, a tax not to exceed one (1) mill on the dollar upon the assessed value of the real and personal property in the city shall be levied annually by the city for the purpose of paying firefighters' retirement salaries and pensions and pensions to the surviving spouses and minor children of deceased firefighters and the surviving spouses and minor children of deceased retired firefighters.

The levy shall be made by the city council or other governing body of the city on or before the time fixed by law for levying county taxes, and the city council or other governing body shall make out and certify to the county clerk the rate of taxation levied by the municipal corporation on the real and personal property within the city.

The amount so certified shall be placed upon the tax book by the county clerk of the county and collected in the same manner that state and county taxes are collected. This amount shall be turned over to the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund of the city, as created under §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820.

However, in those cities that do not have a firemen's relief and pension fund but that cover their firefighters under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the levy shall also be allowed when approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the cities or towns participating in a special election for the purpose of voting on the question.

The election may be held in connection with the first general city election following the passage and approval of this subsection, but the failure to submit at the city or other election shall not defeat the right of submission at any subsequent election.

Upon the filing with the county board of election commissioners not later than ninety (90) days before the date of the election requested in a petition signed by twenty (20) or more qualified electors of the city or town affected, stating the amount of tax to be voted on, not to exceed one (1) mill on the dollar, and praying that the question of a firemen's pension be submitted, it shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to call the election in accordance with § 7-11-201 et seq.

In the event that for any reason the question of a firemen's pension is not voted upon in the next general city election after the passage and approval of this subsection, the question may be submitted at any other general or special election held in the city or town as provided in this subsection.

The ballot shall state the amount of tax being voted on and the purpose thereof, and the question on the ballot shall be as follows:

Once so approved, the levy shall be certified in the same manner as provided in this section and shall be collected and turned over to the city for the sole purpose of payment for coverage of employees under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

A vote on the question of the tax provided for in this section shall be had in the same manner that the Arkansas Constitution and laws of this state provide for the initiation of measures in municipalities.

The funds provided for in this section shall be supplemental to and in addition to any funds provided for by any laws in effect at the time of the passage of this section, shall become part of the firemen's relief and pension fund of the city, as created under §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, and shall be administered by the board of trustees created by those sections, for the same class of beneficiaries and in the same manner as the funds provided for in §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, since it is the specific intention of this section not to repeal §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, or any amendments thereto, but rather to provide additional money for the firemen's relief and pension fund.

In those cities that cover their firefighters under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the funds shall be applied to each city's account in that system in such manner and amounts as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, if:

The city does not have a firemen's relief and pension fund; or

The city has consolidated administration of its firemen's relief and pension fund with the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, even if there are no longer any members or beneficiaries remaining under the city's firemen's relief and pension fund.

“FOR Firemen's Pension

AGAINST Firemen's Pension

History.

Acts 1941, No. 14, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1985, No. 901, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2214, 19-2215, 19-2217; Acts 1989, No. 341, § 2; 2005, No. 2145, § 64; 2007, No. 608, § 2; 2007, No. 1049, § 86; 2009, No. 1480, § 105.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term, “passage of this section,” Acts 1941, No. 14 was signed by the Governor and took effect on January 30, 1941.

In reference to the term, “passage and approval of this subsection,” Acts 1985, No. 901 was signed by the Governor on April 15, 1985, and took effect on June 28, 1985.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§ 7-11-201 et seq.” for “§ 7-5-103(b)” in (b)(3).

24-11-813. Clerk's report to pension review board.

It is made the duty of the clerk of each city, town, or fire improvement district in which an organized firemen's
relief and pension fund is maintained to file following each fiscal year a report with the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board of the number of firefighters with their names, dates of appointment, dates of retirement, birth dates, amounts of pensions paid, and other information as required by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 16; 1927, No. 214, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 7752, 9879; Acts 1985, No. 754, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2224; Acts 2013, No. 41, § 25.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “following each fiscal year” for “on or before December 31 of each year,”
“firefighter” for “fire fighter,” and “Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board” for “pension review board.”

24-11-814. Subjection of fund to legal process.

Either before or after its order of disbursement by the board to disabled members of the fire department, or to the surviving spouse, guardian of any minor children, or dependent parent of the deceased or retired member of the department, no portion of the firemen's relief and pension fund shall be held, seized, taken, subjected to, detained, or levied on by virtue of any attachment, garnishment, execution, injunction, or other order or decree, or any process or proceeding whatever, issued out of or by any court of this state, for the payment or satisfaction, in whole or part, of any debt, damages, claim, demand, or judgment against a member, his or her surviving spouse, the guardian of his or her minor children, or the dependent parent of any deceased member, nor shall the fund or any claim thereto be directly or indirectly assigned or transferred, and any attempt to so assign or transfer shall be void.

The fund shall be sacredly held, kept, and distributed for the purpose of pensioning the persons named in this act and for no other purpose whatever.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 18; Pope's Dig., § 7754; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2226.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.

24-11-815. Appeals.

Any person possessing the qualifications required under this act who deems himself or herself aggrieved by the decision of any board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund, either in rejecting his or her claim or in the amount allowed by the board, or any city or town feeling itself aggrieved by any such decision, may appeal from the decision to the circuit court of the county in which the town or city liable for the claim may be located in the same manner and within the same time as provided for appeals from justices of the peace to circuit courts in civil cases.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 21; Pope's Dig., § 7757; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2228.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.

24-11-816. Membership — Contributions.

Within sixty (60) days from July 1, 1975, each full-paid firefighter and each part-paid firefighter whose salary is fifty dollars ($50.00) or more per month, each part-paid firefighter whose salary is less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per month, and each active volunteer firefighter employed in the fire department of any city or town in this state, who desires that he or she and his or her beneficiaries participate in the firemen's relief and pension fund of the city or town, as created under §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, shall file a statement with the secretary of the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund of the city or town. This statement, in writing under oath, shall state that he or she desires that he or she and his or her beneficiaries participate in the benefits from the fund.

The statement shall include the name and age of those persons immediately dependent upon him or her and shall authorize the governing body of the city to deduct from his or her salary such percentage, not less than six percent (6%) thereof, as may be approved for deduction by the local firemen's pension board.

The statement of an active volunteer fire fighter shall include a promise and an obligation to pay to the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund the sum of twelve dollars ($12.00) per year.

Any municipality or fire protection district in which a firemen's relief and pension fund is established shall contribute to the firemen's relief and pension fund an amount:

Not less than six percent (6%) of the firefighter's salary; or

Equal to the contribution paid by any volunteer firefighters who are members of the fund.

In the event a former member again becomes an employee of the same fire department where previously employed, the firefighter shall again become a member of the system and the credited service forfeited by him or her shall be restored to his or her credit if he or she returns to the fund the amount refunded to him or her plus interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

The interest rate to be paid shall be equal to the fund's average investment rate of return as indicated in the last three (3) annual accountant's reports, but in no event less than six percent (6%).

The repayment shall be made according to such rules as the board shall adopt from time to time.

Any employee who has become a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall remain a member of that system.

Any firefighter who fails or refuses to make and file the statement required by this section to allow deductions from his or her salary or to pay the amount required by this section shall forfeit his or her right to participate in the benefits provided by the firemen's relief and pension fund of the city or town.

This section shall not apply to any firefighter heretofore retired who has a vested right to participate in the fund because he or she has completed the required length of service or because of physical or mental disability incurred in the performance of his or her duty, nor shall this section apply to any firefighter who has a vested right to participate in the fund because he or she has completed the required length of service and who has elected to continue in active service.

If any firefighter shall elect not to participate in the fund, his or her salary shall not be liable for any deductions nor shall he or she be required to pay as provided in this section.

In the event of the resignation or discharge from the fire department of any member, all moneys deducted from the salary of the person or voluntarily paid by the person shall immediately be returned to him or her without interest. However, there shall be deducted from the refund the amount which has been expended by the board, as authorized under § 24-11-803(c), for the purchase of group insurance and payment of premiums thereon for the benefit of the firefighter.

All moneys provided for the fund by this section shall be paid to and received by the treasurer of the city or town for the sole use and benefit of the fund, and the fund shall be used for no other purpose.

The additional duties thus imposed upon the treasurer shall be and comprise additional duties for which he or she shall be liable under his or her oath and bond as the city or town treasurer.

The funds provided for by this section shall be supplemental to and in addition to any fund provided for by any laws in effect at the time of the passage of this section, shall become a part of the firemen's relief and pension fund, as created under §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, and shall be administered by the board created by those sections, in the same manner as the funds provided therein.

It is the specific intention of this section not to repeal §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, but rather to provide additional money for the firemen's relief and pension fund, as created under Acts 1921, No. 491.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 82, §§ 1-5; 1975, No. 450, § 3; 1981, No. 486, § 1; 1983, No. 586, § 1; 1985, No. 244, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2221.1 — 19-2221.5; Acts 1987, No. 389, §§ 2-4; 2019, No. 315, § 2902.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term, “passage of this section,” Acts 1951, No. 82, § 5, declared an emergency and provided the act would be effective from and after its passage. The act was signed by the Governor on February 15, 1951.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(2)(B).

24-11-817. Military service.

In the event that a member of a firemen's relief and pension fund, while an employee, enters the United States Armed Forces during any period of compulsory or voluntary military service, the armed service actually served by him or her shall be credited him or her as service under this subchapter.

In any case of doubt as to the period of armed service to be so credited a member under this section, the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund shall have final power to determine the period.

Except for service credited under subsection (d) of this section, a member shall not be credited with a total of more than five (5) years of armed service.

During the period of armed service and until the member's return as an employee, his or her contributions to the fund shall be suspended, and any balance remaining to his or her credit in the fund shall be accumulated at regular interest.

Under the requirements of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, as in effect October 13, 1996, a member who leaves covered employment to serve in the uniformed services of the United States after giving notice to the employer and who returns to employment shall be treated as not having incurred a break in service with the employer.

The employer shall certify to the pension fund that reemployment was in accordance with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, as in effect October 13, 1996.

Under this subsection, the uniformed services of the United States are limited to the United States Armed Forces, the Army National Guard and Air National Guard when engaged in active duty for training, state active duty, inactive duty training, or full-time National Guard duty, the United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service; and any other category of persons designated by the President of the United States in time of war or national emergency.

The cumulative length of the absence from a position of employment with the employer by reason of service in the uniformed services for which service credit will be given shall not exceed five (5) years.

A member whose uniformed service is honorably terminated and who reports for reemployment under this subsection within the time provided in the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, as in effect October 13, 1996, shall be entitled to accrue benefits for the time the member served in the uniformed services by paying the employee contributions required by § 24-11-816, if any, within the time provided in the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, and by repaying any amount the member may have previously withdrawn from the pension fund, with interest.

An employer reemploying a member under this subsection shall pay to the pension fund the employer contributions due for the time the member served in the uniformed services as required by § 24-11-816.

However, if a member does not pay the employee contributions due, then no employer contributions are due.

For the purposes of determining the employee and employer contributions due, the member's compensation during the period of service in the uniformed services shall be computed at:

The rate the member would have received if the member had not served in the uniformed services; or

The member's average compensation level during the twelve-month period, or shorter if applicable, immediately preceding the service.

Unless both employee and employer contributions are paid, the member shall not be entitled to any accrued benefits for the time served in the uniformed services.

If a member dies on or after January 1, 2007, while performing military services qualified under the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, Pub. L. No. 103-353, the member shall be treated as though he or she resumed covered employment on the day before the day of death.

For a member who had not attained a vested status in the pension fund, sufficient service credit shall accrue to permit the member to become vested.

For a member who had attained a vested status, additional service credit accrual shall not occur.

In all cases, the eligible benefit awarded by the pension fund under this section shall be a nonduty death benefit.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 227, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2236; Acts 1995, No. 1290, § 2; 2013, No. 41, § 26;
2019, No. 474, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “Credit for” at the beginning of the section heading, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment inserted “state active duty” in (d)(2).